Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.031

Information service to legislators.

The reviser shall, to the extent reasonably feasible through available facilities and public sources of information, provide objective and factual information in writing to and upon request of any member of the legislature relative to any matter which is or may be the subject of or involved in, legislation.

[ 1951 c 157 s 13.]